Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Chapter 27. Pay Plan for State Employees.

Administrative Code. —

For adjustments to judicial salaries, see 2 AAC 06.

Sec. 39.27.010.
Basic salary schedule. [Repealed, § 12 ch 80 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 39.27.011.
Salary schedule.

The following monthly basic salary schedule is approved as the pay plan for classified and partially exempt employees in the executive branch of the state government who are not members of a collective bargaining unit established under the authority of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act) and for employees of the legislature under AS 24:

[Repealed, § 38 ch 3 SLA 1980.]

If a state officer or employee is appointed a deputy department head or a division director and, at the time of appointment, the officer or employee is receiving a salary higher than that set for the position to which appointment has been made, the officer or employee is entitled to continue receiving the higher salary. This subsection does not apply to the salary of a person appointed to a position other than a deputy department head or a division director.

The commissioner of administration shall adopt the regulations required under AS

22.05.140(d)

, AS

22.07.090(c)

, AS

22.10.190(d)

, and AS

22.15.220(e)

. The regulations relate to the internal management of state agencies and their adoption is not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). The regulations shall be published in the Alaska Administrative Register and Code for informational purposes.

Effective July 1, 2014, the amounts set out in the salary schedule contained in (a) of this section are increased by one percent.

Effective July 1, 2015, the amounts set out in the salary schedule contained in (a) of this section, as increased under (e) of this section, are increased by 2.5 percent.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 2 TSSLA 2000.]

Pay increments, computed at the rate of 3.25 percent of the employee’s base salary, shall be provided after an employee has remained in the final step within a given range for two years, and every two years thereafter, if, at the time the employee becomes eligible for the increment, the employee’s current annual rating by the employee’s supervisors is designated as “good” or higher.

Pay increments provided for in (h) of this section are approved under AS

39.25.150

(2) as an amendment to the pay plan for employees of the state.

Subsections (h) and (i) of this section apply to employees of the legislature only if the committee responsible for adopting employment policies concerning the employee adopts a written policy that (h) and (i) of this section apply. Subsections (h) and (i) of this section apply to the employees of the office of the ombudsman only if the ombudsman adopts a policy that (h) and (i) of this section apply. Subsections (h) and (i) of this section apply to the employees of the office of victims’ rights only if the victims’ advocate adopts a policy that (h) and (i) of this section apply.

Notwithstanding (a) — (j) of this section, the governor or a designee of the governor may, on a case-by-case basis, authorize for a partially exempt employee in the executive branch a higher pay than Step F. The authorization must be based on a determination that the action serves a critical governmental interest of the state, the employee possesses exceptional qualifications, recruitment difficulties exist, or the action is necessary due to competitive salaries in the relevant labor market. A determination made under this subsection must be in writing.

Range Step Step Step Step Step Step No.
A
B C D E F 5 2,151 2,211 2,273 2,339 2,408 2,471 6 2,273 2,339 2,408 2,471 2,543 2,619 7 2,408 2,471 2,543 2,619 2,698 2,785 8 2,543 2,619 2,698 2,785 2,864 2,951 9 2,698 2,785 2,864 2,951 3,046 3,133 10 2,864 2,951 3,046 3,133 3,229 3,323 11 3,046 3,133 3,229 3,323 3,436 3,545 12 3,229 3,323 3,436 3,545 3,665 3,790 13 3,436 3,545 3,665 3,790 3,922 4,061 14 3,665 3,790 3,922 4,061 4,204 4,363 15 3,922 4,061 4,204 4,363 4,503 4,672 16 4,204 4,363 4,503 4,672 4,841 5,011 17 4,503 4,672 4,841 5,011 5,184 5,361 18 4,841 5,011 5,184 5,361 5,527 5,737 19 5,184 5,361 5,527 5,737 5,917 6,133 20 5,527 5,737 5,917 6,133 6,318 6,551 21 5,917 6,133 6,318 6,551 6,752 6,997 22 6,318 6,551 6,752 6,997 7,225 7,483 23 6,752 6,997 7,225 7,483 7,733 8,022 24 7,225 7,483 7,733 8,022 8,289 8,569 25 7,733 8,022 8,289 8,569 8,879 9,210 26 8,022 8,289 8,569 8,879 9,210 9,541 27 8,289 8,569 8,879 9,210 9,541 9,900 28 8,569 8,879 9,210 9,541 9,900 10,244 29 8,879 9,210 9,541 9,900 10,244 10,606 30 9,210 9,541 9,900 10,244 10,606 10,979

Click to view

History.

(§ 12 ch 148 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 92 SLA 1977; am §§ 1, 10 ch 80 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 16, 30, 31, 38 ch 3 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 87 SLA 1985; am § 7 ch 21 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1990; am §§ 9, 10 ch 19 SLA 1991; am § 11 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am §§ 3 — 5, 8 ch 2 TSSLA 2000; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 53 SLA 2005; am §§ 11 — 14 ch 21 SLA 2008; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 56 SLA 2010; am §§ 10 — 12, 14 ch 47 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For salary adjustments comparable to those made in the salary schedule in (a) of this section to employees of the executive branch who are in the exempt service, not members of collective bargaining units, and not otherwise covered by this section, see § 4, ch. 56, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts, and to judicial officers and employees of the judicial branch, see § 5, ch. 56, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.
For salary increases for certain employees of the University of Alaska payable “in accordance with the compensation policy of the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska,” see § 6, ch. 56, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

For language authorizing adoption of compensation policies like the pay increments authorized by (h) and (i) of this section for noncovered exempt officers and employees of the executive branch, see § 19(b), ch. 21, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.
For language authorizing adoption of those pay increment policies for certain employees of the judicial branch, see § 20(b), ch. 21, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

For transition provisions related to (h) and (i) of this section, see §§ 23 and 24, ch. 21, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

For applicability of the 2013 changes to (a), (e), and (f) of this section to public officers in the exempt service under AS

39.25.110

who are not members of a collective bargaining unit established under AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act) or otherwise covered by (a) of this section, see sec. 20, ch. 47, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For applicability of the 2013 changes to (a), (e), and (f) of this section to permanent and temporary employees and magistrates in the judicial branch, and to judges and justices, see sec. 21, ch. 47, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For salary increases for certain employees of the University of Alaska payable “in accordance with the compensation policy of the Board of Regents of the University of Alaska” see sec. 22, ch. 47, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For applicability of (k) of this section, see sec. 23, ch. 47, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For adjustments to judicial salaries, see 2 AAC 6.

For pay, see 2 AAC 7, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (a), changing the salary amounts in the schedule; in (e), substituted “July 1, 2014” for “July 1, 2011” and “one percent” for “two percent”; in (f), substituted “July 1, 2015” for “July 1, 2012” and “2.5 percent” for “two percent”; added (k); and effective July 1, 2015, substituted “3.25 percent” for “3.75 percent” in (h).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 25, ch. 21, SLA 2008, makes the 2008 repeal and reenactment of (a) of this section retroactive to July 1, 2007.

Legislative history reports. —

For transition provisions related to (h) and (i) of this section, see §§ 23 and 24, ch. 21, SLA 2008, in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 21, SLA 2008 (HB 417), relating to compensation of certain public officials, officers, and employees not covered by collective bargaining agreements, see 2008 House Journal 2146 — 2148.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 56, SLA 2010 (HB 421), relating to compensation of certain public officials, officers, and employees not covered by collective bargaining agreements, see 2010 House Journal 1904.

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the 2013 changes to this section made in ch. 47, SLA 2013 (SB 95), see 2013 Senate Journal 888 — 890.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Interpreting the longevity pay increments provided for by former AS

39.27.022

, so as to suggest that these increments may not be salary steps and, therefore, employees receiving these longevity increments who are promoted to a higher job series are not entitled to the salary increases required by Personnel Rule 9.02.13 and article 7 of the agreement between the state of Alaska and Alaska Public Employees Association covering the general government unit would be at variance with the legislative intent expressed in that section. September 11, 1974 Op. Att’y Gen.

A partially exempt deputy department head is eligible to receive longevity step increases while serving in that position. Mar. 24, 1999, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.27.012.
Temporary salary schedules.

The director of the division of personnel may establish salary schedules providing lesser amounts than those in the basic salary schedule in order to meet salary limit requirements for receipt and expenditure of federal funds. Salary rates established under authority of this section do not affect the salaries of employees provided for by a collective bargaining agreement negotiated under the authority of AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

(Public Employment Relations Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 138 SLA 1975; am § 44 ch 30 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 6, ch. 138, SLA 1975, provided that this section would be repealed on the effective date of a pay schedule adopted under a section enacted by a particular bill. However, that bill did not become law.

Sec. 39.27.015.
Cost-of-living adjustments. [Repealed, § 12 ch 80 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 39.27.020.
Geographic pay differentials.

The following geographic pay differentials established as a percentage above the basic salary schedule provided in AS

39.27.011

are approved as an amendment to the basic salary schedule provided in AS

39.27.011

:

If an employee’s duty station is not included in (a) of this section and is not in a foreign country, the commissioner of administration shall establish by regulation the appropriate geographic pay differential. The regulations are not subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

The commissioner of administration shall establish geographic pay differentials for positions in foreign countries. The differentials shall be adjusted annually, effective July 1, to maintain equity between salaries for positions in foreign countries and salaries for positions in the state.

Duty Station Geographic PayDifferential Anchor Point 0 Anchorage 0 Anchorage International Airport 0 Aniak 50 Anvik 50 Auke Bay 5 Barrow 50 Bethel 50 Camp Carroll 0 Cantwell 0 Chena River 3 Chignik 50 Chitina 0 Cold Bay 50 Coldfoot Camp 37 Cooper Landing 0 Cordova 11 Craig 0 Crown Point 0 Deadhorse 50 Delta Junction 0 Denali 0 Dillingham 37 Douglas 5 Dutch Harbor 60 Eagle 0 Eagle River 0 Eielson Air Force Base 3 Elfin Cove 0 Elmendorf Air Force Base 0 Emmonak 50 Fairbanks 3 Finger Lake 0 Fort Richardson 0 Fort Wainwright 3 Fort Yukon 37 Gakona 0 Galena 37 Girdwood 0 Glennallen 0 Gustavus 0 Haines 0 Harding Lake 3 Healy 0 Homer 0 Hoonah 0 Iliamna 50 Juneau 5 Kaltag 50 Kenai 0 Ketchikan 0 King Cove 50 King Salmon 50 Klawock 0 Kodiak 11 Kotzebue 60 Mackenzie Point 0 Matanuska 0 McGrath 37 Mount Edgecumbe 5 Nancy 0 Nenana 0 Nikiski 0 Ninilchik 0 Nome 37 Northway 0 Palmer 0 Pelican 0 Petersburg 0 Port Alsworth 50 Port Moller 50 Saint Mary’s 50 Sand Point 50 Selawik 60 Seward 0 Sitka 5 Skagway 0 Soldotna 0 Sterling 0 Sutton 0 Talkeetna 0 Tazlina 0 Tenakee Springs 0 Tok 0 Trapper Creek 0 Unalakleet 50 Unalaska 60 Valdez 11 Wasilla 0 Whittier 0 Willow 0 Wrangell 0 Yakutat 0 Other states 0

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 158 SLA 1966; am § 8 ch 101 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 47 SLA 1974; am § 3 ch 138 SLA 1975; am § 13 ch 148 SLA 1976; am §§ 32, 33 ch 3 SLA 1980; am § 45 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 47 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 6, ch. 138, SLA 1975, provided that this section would be repealed on the effective date of a pay schedule adopted under a section enacted by a particular bill. However, that bill did not become law.

Cross references. —

For transition provisions relating to application of the geographic pay differential to certain state employees employed on July 1, 2013, see sec. 24, ch. 47, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the 2013 changes to this section, see 2013 Senate Journal 888 — 890.

Sec. 39.27.022.
Pay increments for longevity in state service. [Repealed, § 17 ch 21 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 39.27.025.
Swing and graveyard shift differentials.

Classified and partially exempt state employees who regularly work a “swing” shift beginning between 12:00 noon and 7:59 p.m. are entitled to a one-step increase over their normal pay established by this chapter.

Classified and partially exempt state employees who regularly work a “graveyard” shift beginning between 8:00 p.m. and 3:59 a.m. are entitled to a two-step increase over their normal pay established by this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 87 SLA 1971)

Sec. 39.27.030.
Geographic pay differential survey.

Subject to appropriation, the director of the division of personnel shall conduct a survey, at least every five years, to review the geographic pay differentials under AS

39.27.020

. The survey may address factors the director determines are relevant to review state salary schedules, entitlements for beneficiaries of state programs, and payments for state service providers. The survey must reflect the cost of living for duty stations in the state or outside of the state by using the cost of living in Anchorage, Alaska, as a base.

History.

(§ 1 ch 226 SLA 1970; am §§ 1, 2, 4 ch 42 SLA 1971; am § 12 ch 4 FSSLA 1996; am § 86 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 16 ch 47 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

For gathering data reflecting the cost of living in various election districts, see AS

44.31.020

(4).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 45, ch. 4, FSSLA 1996, the provisions of that act, which amended this section, are not severable, notwithstanding AS

01.10.030

.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the 2013 changes to this section made in sec. 16, ch. 47, SLA 2013 (SB 95), see 2013 Senate Journal 888 — 890.

Sec. 39.27.035.
Preparation and submission of pay schedules. [Repealed, § 20 ch 4 FSSLA 1996.]

Sec. 39.27.040.
University salary survey. [Repealed, § 20 ch 4 FSSLA 1996.]

Sec. 39.27.045.
Definition. [Repealed, § 19 ch 47 SLA 2013.]